Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 11. Appeal.

§ 16.1-296.
Jurisdiction of appeals; procedure.

From any final order or judgment of the juvenile court affecting the rights or interests of any person coming within its jurisdiction, an appeal may be taken to the circuit court within 10 days from the entry of a final judgment, order or conviction and shall be heard de novo. However, in a case arising under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (§

20-88.32

et seq.), a party may take an appeal pursuant to this section within 30 days from entry of a final order or judgment. Protective orders issued pursuant to §

16.1-279.1

in cases of family abuse and orders entered pursuant to §

16.1-278.2

are final orders from which an appeal may be taken.

Upon receipt of notice of such appeal the juvenile court shall forthwith transmit to the attorney for the Commonwealth a report incorporating the results of any investigation conducted pursuant to §

16.1-273

, which shall be confidential in nature and made available only to the court and the attorney for the defendant (i) after the guilt or innocence of the accused has been determined or (ii) after the court has made its findings on the issues subject to appeal. After final determination of the case, the report and all copies thereof shall be forthwith returned to such juvenile court.

Where an appeal is taken by a child on a finding that he or she is delinquent and on a disposition pursuant to §

16.1-278.8

, trial by jury on the issue of guilt or innocence of the alleged delinquent act may be had on motion of the child, the attorney for the Commonwealth or the circuit court judge. If the alleged delinquent act is one which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony, the child shall be entitled to a jury of 12 persons. In all other cases, the jury shall consist of seven persons. If the jury in such a trial finds the child guilty, disposition shall be by the judge pursuant to the provisions of §

16.1-278.8

after taking into consideration the report of any investigation made pursuant to §

16.1-237

or

16.1-273

.

When an appeal is taken in a case involving termination of parental rights brought under §

16.1-283

, the circuit court shall hold a hearing on the merits of the case within 90 days of the perfecting of the appeal. An appeal of the case to the Court of Appeals shall take precedence on the docket of the Court.

Where an appeal is taken by an adult on a finding of guilty of an offense within the jurisdiction of the juvenile and domestic relations district court, the appeal shall be dealt with in all respects as is an appeal from a general district court pursuant to §§

16.1-132

through

16.1-137

; however, where an appeal is taken by any person on a charge of nonsupport, the procedure shall be as is provided for appeals in prosecutions under Chapter 5 (§

20-61

et seq.) of Title 20.

In all other cases on appeal, proceedings in the circuit court shall be heard without a jury; however, hearing of an issue by an advisory jury may be allowed, in the discretion of the judge, upon the motion of any party. An appeal from an order of protection issued pursuant to §

16.1-279.1

shall be given precedence on the docket of the court over other civil appeals taken to the circuit court from the district courts and shall be assigned a case number within two business days of receipt of such appeal.If a party files an appeal of a district court order of protection entered pursuant to §

16.1-279.1

, such notice of appeal shall be on a form prescribed by the Office of the Executive Secretary. The district court clerk shall contact the appellate court to determine whether the hearing on the appeal shall be set by the appellate court on (i) a date scheduled by the district court clerk with the court, (ii) on the next docket call date, or (iii) a date set for district court appeals. Once the hearing date is set and the appeal documents have been transmitted, the appellate court shall have the parties served with notice of the appeal stating the date and time of the hearing in accordance with subdivision 1 of §

8.01-296

. No such hearing on the appeal shall be heard in the appellate court unless the appellee has been so served with such notice or notice has been waived by the non-moving party.

Costs, taxes and fees on appealed cases shall be assessed only in those cases in which a trial fee could have been assessed in the juvenile and domestic relations court and shall be collected in the circuit court, except that the appeal to circuit court of any case in which a fee either was or could have been assessed pursuant to §

16.1-69.48:5

shall also be in accordance with §

16.1-296.2

.

No appeal bond shall be required of a party appealing from an order of a juvenile and domestic relations district court except for that portion of any order or judgment establishing a support arrearage or suspending payment of support during pendency of an appeal. In cases involving support, no appeal shall be allowed until the party applying for the same or someone for him gives bond, in an amount and with sufficient surety approved by the judge or by his clerk if there is one, to abide by such judgment as may be rendered on appeal if the appeal is perfected or, if not perfected, then to satisfy the judgment of the court in which it was rendered. Upon appeal from a conviction for failure to support or from a finding of civil or criminal contempt involving a failure to support, the juvenile and domestic relations district court may require the party applying for the appeal or someone for him to give bond, with or without surety, to insure his appearance and may also require bond in an amount and with sufficient surety to secure the payment of prospective support accruing during the pendency of the appeal. An appeal will not be perfected unless such appeal bond as may be required is filed within 30 days from the entry of the final judgment or order. However, no appeal bond shall be required of the Commonwealth or when an appeal is proper to protect the estate of a decedent, an infant, a convict or an insane person, or the interest of a county, city or town.If bond is furnished by or on behalf of any party against whom judgment has been rendered for money, the bond shall be conditioned for the performance and satisfaction of such judgment or order as may be entered against the party on appeal, and for the payment of all damages which may be awarded against him in the appellate court. If the appeal is by a party against whom there is no recovery, the bond shall be conditioned for the payment of any damages as may be awarded against him on the appeal. The provisions of §

16.1-109

shall apply to bonds required pursuant to this subsection.This subsection shall not apply to release on bail pursuant to other subsections of this section or §

16.1-298

.

In all cases on appeal, the circuit court in the disposition of such cases shall have all the powers and authority granted by the chapter to the juvenile and domestic relations district court. Unless otherwise specifically provided by this Code, the circuit court judge shall have the authority to appoint counsel for the parties and compensate such counsel in accordance with the provisions of Article 6 (§

16.1-266

et seq.) of this chapter.

In any case which has been referred or transferred from a circuit court to a juvenile court and an appeal is taken from an order or judgment of the juvenile court, the appeal shall be taken to the circuit court in the same locality as the juvenile court to which the case had been referred or transferred.

C1.

In any hearing held upon an appeal taken by a child on a finding that he is delinquent and on a disposition pursuant to §

16.1-278.8

, the provisions of §

16.1-302

shall apply mutatis mutandis, except in the case of trial by jury which shall be open. If proceedings in the circuit court are closed pursuant to this subsection, any records or portions thereof relating to such closed proceedings shall remain confidential.

C2.

Where an appeal is taken by a juvenile on a finding that he is delinquent and on a disposition pursuant to §

16.1-278.8

and the juvenile is in a secure facility pending the appeal, the circuit court, when practicable, shall hold a hearing on the merits of the case within 45 days of the filing of the appeal. Upon receipt of the notice of appeal from the juvenile court, the circuit court shall provide a copy of the order and a copy of the notice of appeal to the attorney for the Commonwealth within seven days after receipt of notice of an appeal. The time limitations shall be tolled during any period in which the juvenile has escaped from custody. A juvenile held continuously in secure detention shall be released from confinement if there is no hearing on the merits of his case within 45 days of the filing of the appeal. The circuit court may extend the time limitations for a reasonable period of time based upon good cause shown, provided the basis for such extension is recorded in writing and filed among the papers of the proceedings.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-214; 1956, c. 555; 1966, c. 237; 1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 445; 1981, c. 109; 1982, c. 465; 1983, c. 88; 1984, c. 631; 1986, cc. 143, 465; 1989, c. 473; 1991, c. 534; 1993, c. 970; 1994, c. 673; 1995, c. 517; 1996, c. 866; 1997, cc. 654, 664, 790, 862; 1998, c. 550; 2004, cc. 468, 659, 727; 2005, c. 681; 2007, c. 464; 2009, c. 729; 2019, c. 718; 2020, c. 905.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 1993, c. 970, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 3 and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 5, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 970, cl. 1, “shall expire on May 31, 1998; provided, however, that the provisions of this act shall apply on and after June 1, 1998, only to any final order which disposes of a proceeding in a support case, when such proceeding was commenced in a juvenile and domestic relations district court prior to June 1, 1998, and when such case is appealed to the circuit court, regardless of whether such proceeding was commenced by a petition, motion or other pleading.”

Acts 1994, c. 673, cl. 3 provides that the provisions of §

16.1-296

as amended by this act shall expire on the effective date of Chapter 929 of the 1993 Acts of Assembly. Chapter 929 never became effective.

Acts 1995, c. 517, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 1996, if funds are provided pursuant to the provisions of the third enactment of Chapter 930 of the Acts of Assembly of 1993 as amended by the second enactment of Chapter 564 of the Acts of Assembly of 1994.” The funding was never provided.

Acts 2009, c. 729, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declarative of existing law.”

The 1993 amendment

added the subsection A designation, and substituted “within ten days from the entry of a final judgment, order or conviction” for “in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 7 (§

16.1-123.1

et seq.) of this title” in the first sentence; added the subsection designations B through G; added subsection H; and added the subsection designations I and J. See the Editor’s note for the expiration date.

The 1994 amendment

substituted “Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (§

20-88.32

et seq.)” for “Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act (§

20-88.12

et seq.)” in subsection A, and substituted “in the same locality as the juvenile court to which the case had been referred or transferred” for “which had original jurisdiction of the case” in subsection J. See the Editor’s note for the expiration date.

The 1995 amendment

added the present third sentence in the first paragraph of subsection H.

The 1998 amendment

added the second sentence in subsection D.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 468 added subsection C2 and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 659 and 727 are identical, and substituted “10” for “ten” in subsection A; substituted “30” for “thirty” in subsections A and H; substituted “12” for “twelve” in subsection C; substituted “90” for “ninety” in subsection D; and inserted “except that the appeal to circuit court of any case in which a fee either was or could have been assessed pursuant to §

16.1-69.48:5

shall also be in accordance with §

16.1-296.2

” in subsection G.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 681, effective January 1, 2006, substituted “be heard without a jury; however, hearing of an issue by an advisory jury” for “conform to the equity practice where evidence is heard ore tenus; however, an issue out of chancery” in subsection F; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 464 added the last sentence in the second paragraph of subsection H.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 729, in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “to the circuit court” and “and shall be heard de novo.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 718, in subsection F, substituted “courts and shall be assigned a case number within two business days of receipt of such appeal” for “courts, but shall otherwise be docketed and processed as other civil cases.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 905 added the second paragraph in subsection F.

Law Review.

For comment, “Jury Trials for Juvenile Delinquents in Virginia,” see 28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 135 (1971).

For note, “Review of Improper Juvenile Transfer Hearings,” see 60 Va. L. Rev. 818 (1974).

For article, “The Revision of Virginia’s Juvenile Court Law,” see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 847 (1979).

For survey on domestic relations in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For 1994 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 981 (1994).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For annual survey, “A Look Back and Forward: Legislative and Regulatory Highlights for 2008 and 2009 and a Discussion of Juvenile Transfer,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (2009).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-231 Notice of Appeal — Support Proceeding.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A Courts, § 37; 9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 87.

§ 16.1-296.1.
Repealed by Acts 1999, c. 161.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, c. 3, provides that the enactment of §

16.1-296.2

by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

§ 16.1-296.2.
Appeals of certain custody and visitation proceedings.

In any matter in which a filing fee either was or could have been assessed pursuant to §

16.1-69.48:5

, no appeal shall be allowed unless and until the party applying for appeal shall, within 10 days from the entry of the final judgment or order, either (i) pay to the clerk of the court from which the appeal is taken the amount of the writ tax of the court to which the appeal is taken and all other applicable costs or (ii) file with the clerk of the court from which the appeal is taken a petition to have the court to which the appeal is taken determine that the writ tax and costs need not be paid on account of poverty as provided in §

17.1-606

. The judge or clerk of any court from which the appeal is taken shall promptly transmit to the clerk of the appellate court the original pleadings, together with all exhibits and other papers filed in the trial of the case, and either (i) the writ tax and costs paid or (ii) a petition filed to have the court to which the appeal is taken determine that the writ tax and costs need not be paid on account of poverty as provided in §

17.1-606

. Upon receipt of the foregoing by the clerk of the appellate court, the case shall then be docketed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the writ tax of the court to which the appeal is taken and other applicable costs shall be assessed only once for all custody and visitation petitions simultaneously appealed by a single appellant.

History.

2004, cc. 659, 727.

§ 16.1-297.
Final judgment; copy filed with juvenile court; proceeding may be remanded to juvenile court.

Upon the rendition of final judgment upon an appeal from the juvenile and domestic relations district court, the circuit court shall cause a copy of its judgment to be filed with the juvenile court within twenty-one days of entry of its order, which shall thereupon become the judgment of the juvenile court. In the event such circuit court does not dismiss the proceedings or discharge such child or adult, the circuit court may remand the child or adult to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for its supervision and care, under the terms of its order or judgment, and thereafter such child or adult shall be and remain under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court in the same manner as if such court had rendered the judgment in the first instance.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-215; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1996, c. 828.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of criminal law and procedure, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 133 (2004).

For article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 7 (2019).

§ 16.1-298.
Effect of petition for or pendency of appeal; bail.

Except as provided herein, a petition for or the pendency of an appeal or writ of error shall not suspend any judgment, order or decree of the juvenile court nor operate to discharge any child concerned or involved in the case from the custody of the court or other person, institution or agency to which the child has been committed unless so ordered by the judge of the juvenile court, the judge of a circuit court or directed in a writ of supersedeas by the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court or a judge or justice thereof.

The judgment, order or decree of the juvenile court shall be suspended upon a petition for or the pendency of an appeal or writ of error:

In cases of delinquency in which the final order of the juvenile court is pursuant to subdivision A 8, 9, 10, 12, 14, or 15 of §

16.1-278.8

.

In cases involving a child and any local ordinance.

In cases involving any person over the age of 18 years.Such suspension as is provided for in this subsection shall not apply to (i) an order for support of a spouse, parent or child or to a preliminary protective order issued pursuant to §

16.1-253

, (ii) an order disposing of a motion to reconsider relating to participation in continuing programs pursuant to §

16.1-289.1

, (iii) a protective order in cases of family abuse issued pursuant to §

16.1-279.1

, including a protective order required by §

16.1-253

.2, or a protective order entered in conjunction with a disposition pursuant to §

16.1-278.2

,

16.1-278.4

,

16.1-278.5

,

16.1-278.6

,

16.1-278.8

, or

16.1-278.14

, (iv) a protective order issued pursuant to §

19.2-152.10

, including a protective order required by §

18.2-60.4

, or (v) an order pertaining to the custody, visitation, or placement of a minor child, unless so ordered by the judge of a circuit court or directed in a writ of supersedeas by the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court.

In cases where the order of the juvenile court is suspended pursuant to subsection B hereof or by order of the juvenile court or the circuit court, bail may be required as provided for in §

16.1-135

.

If an appeal to the circuit court is withdrawn in accordance with §

16.1-106.1

, the judgment, order, or decree rendered by the juvenile court shall have the same legal effect as if no appeal had been noted, except as to the disposition of any bond in circuit court or as modified by the circuit court pursuant to subsection F of §

16.1-106.1

. If an appeal is withdrawn, any court-appointed counsel or court-appointed guardian ad litem shall, absent further order of the court, be relieved of any further obligation respecting the matter for which they were appointed.

Except as to matters pending on the docket of a circuit court as of July 1, 2008, all orders that were entered by a juvenile and domestic relations district court prior to July 1, 2008, and appealed to a circuit court, where the appeal was withdrawn, shall have the same effect as if no appeal had been noted.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-216; 1956, c. 555; 1966, c. 224; 1977, c. 559; 1984, cc. 631, 703; 1988, c. 771; 1991, c. 534; 1996, c. 866; 1997, c. 831; 1998, c. 550; 2008, c. 706; 2013, cc. 73, 97.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection B, in subdivision 3, in the second paragraph, in clause (iii), inserted the language beginning “or a protective order” and ending “§

16.1-278.8

.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 706, in subdivision B 3, deleted “or” at the end of clause (iii), inserted “or” at the end of clause (iv) and inserted clause (v) and made minor related changes; and added subsections D and E.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 73 and 97 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “18” for “eighteen” near the end of subdivision B 3, and in the concluding paragraph, inserted “including a protective order required by §

16.1-253.2

” and “or

16.1-278.14

” in clause (iii) and “including a protective order required by §

18.2-60.4

” in clause (iv).